src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
!Distributed under the terms of the GNU General Public License version 2
! or any later version.

! =============== !
! Noun morphology !
! =============== !

!! - tp = taggit (nomen) m/suff -p = nomen med svag bøjning = aaka
!! - tpt = taggit (nomen) m/suff og t-stamme og -p = nomen med svag bøjning = apun:apute
!! - tup = taggit (nomen) m/suff -up = nomen med sterk bøjning = iqaluk

! ================================= !
! Distributing the declension types !
! ================================= !

! We first add +N and divide into subgroups

LEXICON tp !aġnaq ere
 +N: tp_sing ;
 +N: tp_du   ;
 +N: tp_pl   ;

LEXICON tp_gem !geminating stems of 1. declination - amaġuq nusaq/nuyaq
 +N: tp_gem_sing ;
 +N: tp_gem_du   ;
 +N: tp_gem_pl   ;

LEXICON tpt
 +N: tpt_sing ;
 +N: tpt_du   ;
 +N: tp_pl    ;

LEXICON tup !aiviq
 +N: tup_sg_du_pl ; ! awaiting a split into sg/du/pl lexica

LEXICON tup- !siksrik iñuk
 +N: tup-_sg_du_pl ; ! awaiting a split into sg/du/pl lexica


!=======================!
! Simple 1. declination !
!=======================!

LEXICON tp_sing !erre
     +Abs+Sg:             clit_sing       ;
     +Rel+Sg:^TRUNC%>m   clit_sing       ;
 +Abs+Sg+1Sg:^FRIC%>ga   clit_sing       ;
 +Abs+Sg+2Sg:^TRUNC%>n   clit_sing       ;
 +Abs+Sg+3Sg:^TRUNC%>a   clit_sing       ; !Not verified aġnaq
            :^TRUNC      ObliqueCases_Sg ;
        +QAQ:^TRUNC%>qaq IV              ;
         +IT:^TRUNC%>it  IV              ;

! The possessive paradigms are deviant, there are
! just some slotholder forms here. When full paradigms
! are added they should be moved to a separate section.

LEXICON tp_dupl
  tp_du ;
  tp_pl ;

LEXICON tp_du
          +Abs+Du:^TRUNC^C%>k clit            ;
                 :^C%>k        ObliqueCases_Du ;
      +Abs+Du+1Sg:^TRUNC%>kka  clit            ;
      +Abs+Du+2Sg:^TRUNC%>kiñ  clit            ;
 +Abs+Du+2Sg+Arch:^TRUNC%>kkiñ clit            ;

LEXICON tp_pl
     +Abs+Pl:^TRUNC%>t    clit            ;
     +Abs+Pl:^TRUNC%>ch   clit            ; ! hypercorrect
            :^TRUNC       ObliqueCases_Pl ;
 +Abs+Pl+1Sg:^TRUNC%>tka  clit            ;
 +Abs+Pl+2Sg:^TRUNC%>tin  clit            ;
 +Abs+Pl+3Sg:^TRUNC%>ŋi   clit            ;
 +Rel+Pl+3Sg:^TRUNC%>ŋisa clit            ;


!===========================!
! Geminating 1. declination !
!===========================!

LEXICON tp_gem_sing
                           ObliqueCases_Sg ;
     +Abs+Sg:              clit            ;
     +Rel+Sg:^TRUNC^C%>m clit            ; ! = kal???
 +Abs+Sg+1Sg:^FRIC%>ga    clit            ; !just a slotholder
 +Abs+Sg+2Sg:^TRUNC%>n    clit            ; !just a slotholder
        +QAQ:^TRUNC%>qaq  IV              ;
         +IT:^TRUNC%>it   IV              ;

LEXICON tp_gem_du
          +Abs+Du:^TRUNC^DEFRIC%>k clit            ;
                 :^C%>k             ObliqueCases_Du ;
      +Abs+Du+1Sg:^TRUNC%>kka       clit            ; !just a slotholder
      +Abs+Du+2Sg:^TRUNC%>kiñ       clit            ; !just a slotholder
 +Abs+Du+2Sg+Arch:^TRUNC%>kkiñ      clit            ; !just a slotholder

LEXICON tp_gem_pl
     +Abs+Pl:^TRUNC^C%>t clit            ;
            :^TRUNC^C%>t ObliqueCases_Pl ;
 +Abs+Pl+1Sg:^TRUNC%>tka  clit            ; !just a slotholder
 +Abs+Pl+2Sg:^TRUNC%>tin  clit            ; !just a slotholder



! ======================= !
! 1. declination in schwa !
! ======================= !


LEXICON tpt_sing !aŋun:aŋute
     +Abs+Sg:^CVCTRUNC%>n clit            ;
     +Rel+Sg:%>m           clit            ;
 +Abs+Sg+1Sg:^FRIC%>ga    clit            ; !just a slotholder
 +Abs+Sg+2Sg:^TRUNC%>n    clit            ; !just a slotholder
            :^CVCTRUNC%>n ObliqueCases_Sg ;
        +QAQ:^TRUNC%>qaq  IV              ;
         +IT:%>it          IV              ;

LEXICON tpt_du
          +Abs+Du:^EBLOCK%>k   clit            ;
                 :^EBLOCK%>k   ObliqueCases_Du ;
      +Abs+Du+1Sg:^TRUNC%>kka  clit            ; !just a slotholder
      +Abs+Du+2Sg:^TRUNC%>kiñ  clit            ; !just a slotholder
 +Abs+Du+2Sg+Arch:^TRUNC%>kkiñ clit            ; !just a slotholder

! Plural forms go to tp_pl, there is no separate tpt_pl lexicon


!=======================!
! Simple 2. declination !
!=======================!

! (assuming tup is 2nd decl)

LEXICON tup_sg_du_pl
 +Abs+Sg:               clit         ;
 +Abs+Pl:%>^FRIC%>it   clit         ;
                        ObliqueCases ; ! Not checked for stem adjustment
    +QAQ:^TRUNC%>qaq   IV           ;
     +IT:^SCHWADEL%>it IV           ;

! This paradigm must be completed

LEXICON tup-_sg_du_pl
     +Abs+Sg:               clit         ;
     +Abs+Du:^TRUNC^C%>k  clit         ;
     +Abs+Pl:^TRUNC%>it    clit         ;
 +Abs+Sg+1Sg:^FRIC%>ga     clit         ; ! to be moved to Px section
                            ObliqueCases ; ! Not checked for stem adjustment
        +QAQ:^TRUNC%>qaq   IV           ;
         +IT:^SCHWADEL%>it IV           ;

! This paradigm must be completed


! ============= !
! Oblique cases !
! ============= !

LEXICON ObliqueCases
  ObliqueCases_Sg ;
  ObliqueCases_Du ;
  ObliqueCases_Pl ;

LEXICON ObliqueCases_Sg
  +Loc+Sg:%>mi               clit_sing ;
  +Mod+Sg:%>mik              clit_sing ;
  +Trm+Sg:%>mun              clit_sing ;
  +Abl+Sg:%>miñ              clit_sing ;
! +Trm+Sg:^CVCTRUNC%>n%>mun clit      ; ! Check, from tp_sing

LEXICON ObliqueCases_Du
 +Loc+Du:%>ni clit ;

LEXICON ObliqueCases_Pl
 +Loc+Pl:%>ni  clit ;
 +Trm+Pl:%>nun clit ;

! This paradigm must be completed



! ============================================== !
! Lexica for propernouns, pronouns and particles !
! ============================================== !

! Proper nouns ! Still a dummy
LEXICON propmorph
 +N+Prop: clit ; ! Both tags here

! Pronouns ! Still a dummy
LEXICON pronmorph
 +Pron: clit ; ! thus no +N tag here

! Particles
LEXICON partmorph
 +Part:%> clit ;
